src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON andi
   +A: HOMONYM_ADJ_FORMS ;
 +Adv: #                 ;

LEXICON HOMONYM_ADJ_FORMS
 +Msc: HOMONYM_ADJ_NUM ;
 +Fem: HOMONYM_ADJ_NUM ;
 +Neu: HOMONYM_ADJ_NUM ;

LEXICON HOMONYM_ADJ_NUM
 +Sg: HOMONYM_ADJ_CASE ;
 +Pl: HOMONYM_ADJ_CASE ;

LEXICON HOMONYM_ADJ_CASE
 +Nom: HOMONYM_ADJ_DEF ;
 +Acc: HOMONYM_ADJ_DEF ;
 +Gen: HOMONYM_ADJ_DEF ;
 +Dat: HOMONYM_ADJ_DEF ;

LEXICON HOMONYM_ADJ_DEF
 +Indef: # ;
   +Def: # ;


! Irregular comaratives
! =====================

LEXICON indecladj
 +A: HOMONYM_ADJ_FORMS ;

! Intermediate adjectival lexica
! ==============================

LEXICON adj_a
 +Der/heit:heit kv2 ;
  a_non_umlaut ; ! For the non-umlauted forms
  a_umlaut     ; ! for the umlauted forms

LEXICON a_non_umlaut
  a_m_sg_n         ;
  a_non_umlaut_obl ;

LEXICON a_non_umlaut_obl
  a_m_sg_a ;
  a_m_sg_g ;

  a_m_pl_n ;
  a_m_pl_a ;
  a_m_pl_g ;

  a_f_sg_a ;
  a_f_sg_d ; 
  a_f_sg_g ;

  a_f_pl_n ;
  a_f_pl_a ;
  a_f_pl_d ;
  a_f_pl_g ;

  a_n_sg_n ;
  a_n_sg_a ;

  a_n_sg_g ;
  a_n_pl_g ;

LEXICON a_umlaut
  a_m_sg_d ;
  a_m_pl_d ;

  a_f_sg_n ;

  a_n_sg_d ;
  a_n_pl_n ;
  a_n_pl_a ;
  a_n_pl_d ;


LEXICON adj_r_gen
  a_m_pl_g_ra  ;
  a_f_sg_g_rar ;
  a_f_pl_g_ra  ;
  a_n_pl_g_ra  ;

! Adjectival case lexica
! ======================


! Indefinite declension
! _____________________

LEXICON Sg_Msc1
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ur	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>an	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;

LEXICON Sg_Msc1_Uuml
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ur	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>an	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;

LEXICON Sg_Msc2
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ur	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>an	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um	 # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>	 # ;

LEXICON Pl_Msc1 
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ir  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a 	 # ;

LEXICON Pl_Msc1_Uuml 
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ir  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a 	 # ;

LEXICON Pl_Msc2 
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ir  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a 	 # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ra	 # ;

LEXICON Pl_Msc2_Uuml 
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ir  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um  # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a 	 # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ra	 # ;

LEXICON msgpl
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:^EPH%>an # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:^EPH%>um # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:^EPH%>ir # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:^EPH%>ar # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:^EPH%>um # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:^EPH%>a  # ;

LEXICON Pl_Msc3 
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>nir # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>nar # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>num # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>na  # ;

LEXICON Sg_Fem1
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%> 	 # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>a 	 # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ar  # ;

LEXICON Sg_Fem1_Uuml
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:^UUML%> 	 # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>a 	 # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ar  # ;

LEXICON Sg_Fem2
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%> 	 # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>a 	 # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>rar # ;

LEXICON Sg_Fem2_Uuml
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:^UUML%> 	 # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>a 	 # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ari # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>rar # ;

LEXICON Pl_Fem1 
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um	 # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a	 # ;

LEXICON Pl_Fem1_Uuml 
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um	 # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a	 # ;

LEXICON Pl_Fem2 
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um	 # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a	 # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ra	 # ;
 
LEXICON Pl_Fem2_Uuml 
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um	 # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a	 # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ra	 # ;
 
LEXICON fsgpl
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:^EPH%>a   # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:^EPH%>ari # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:^EPH%>ar  # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:^EPH%>ar # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:^EPH%>ar # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:^EPH%>um # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:^EPH%>a	 # ;

LEXICON Pl_Fem3 
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>nar # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>nar # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>num # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>na	 # ;

LEXICON Sg_Neu1 
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;

LEXICON Sg_Neu1_Uuml 
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;

LEXICON Sg_Neu2 
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>	 # ;

LEXICON Sg_Neu3 
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;

LEXICON Sg_Neu3_Uuml 
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;

LEXICON Pl_Neu1
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%> 	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a	 # ;

LEXICON Pl_Neu1_Uuml
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:^UUML%>	 	# ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:^UUML%> 	 	# ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um 	# ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a	 # ;

LEXICON Pl_Neu2
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%> 	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ara	 # ;
 
LEXICON Pl_Neu2_Uuml
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:^UUML%>	 	# ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:^UUML%> 	 	# ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:^UUML%>um 	# ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ara	 # ;
 
LEXICON nsgpl
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:^EPH%>um	 # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%> 	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:^EPH%>um	 # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:^EPH%>a	 # ;
 

! Msc
LEXICON a_m_sg_n
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ur # ;

LEXICON a_m_sg_n_null
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: # ;

LEXICON a_m_sg_a
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>an # ;

LEXICON a_m_sg_d
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um # ;

LEXICON a_m_sg_g
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s # ;

LEXICON a_m_pl_n
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ir # ;

LEXICON a_m_pl_a
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar # ;

LEXICON a_m_pl_d
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um # ;

LEXICON a_m_pl_g
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a # ;

LEXICON a_m_pl_g_ra
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ra # ;


! Fem

LEXICON a_f_sg_n
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:^UUML # ;
 
LEXICON a_f_sg_n_null
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: # ;

LEXICON a_f_sg_a
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>a # ;

LEXICON a_f_sg_d
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ari # ;

LEXICON a_f_sg_g
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ar # ;

LEXICON a_f_sg_g_rar
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>rar # ;

LEXICON a_f_pl_n
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ar # ;

LEXICON a_f_pl_a
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ar # ;

LEXICON a_f_pl_d
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um # ;

LEXICON a_f_pl_g
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a # ;

LEXICON a_f_pl_g_ra
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ra # ;


! Neu

LEXICON a_n_sg_n
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>t # ;
              +Adv:%>t # ;

LEXICON a_n_sg_a
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>t # ;

LEXICON a_n_sg_d
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>um # ;

LEXICON a_n_sg_g
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>s # ;

LEXICON a_n_pl_n
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%> # ;

LEXICON a_n_pl_a
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%> # ;

LEXICON a_n_pl_d
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>um # ;

LEXICON a_n_pl_g
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>a # ;

LEXICON a_n_pl_g_ra
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ra # ;


! Definite declension
! ___________________

LEXICON Pos_Def
! Positiv, def
! Msc
 +Msc+Sg+Nom+Def:%>i # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc+Def:%>a # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:%>a # ;
 +Msc+Sg+Gen+Def:%>a # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Nom+Def:%>u # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Acc+Def:%>u # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Dat+Def:%>u # ;
 +Msc+Pl+Gen+Def:%>u # ;
! Fem
 +Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:%>a # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:%>u # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%>u # ;
 +Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:%>u # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:%>u # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:%>u # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:%>u # ;
 +Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:%>u # ;
! Neu
 +Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:%>a # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:%>a # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:%>a # ;
 +Neu+Sg+Gen+Def:%>a # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:%>u # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:%>u # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Dat+Def:%>u # ;
 +Neu+Pl+Gen+Def:%>u # ;
