src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjectives
afturvirkandi andi ;
óávirkandi andi ;
altavgerandi andi ;
avbjóðandi andi ;
avgerðandi andi ;
avvarandi andi ;
avvísandi andi ;
búsitandi andi ;
eftiransandi andi ;
eftirfarandi andi ;
einaráðandi andi ;
einastandandi andi ;
eyðmýkjandi andi ;
framkomandi andi ;
framstandandi andi ;
framúrskarandi andi ;
friðarvarveitandi andi ;
friðarvarðveitandi andi ;
friðarveitandi andi ;
fráfarandi andi ;
fyriliggjandi andi ;
fyrrverandi andi ;
fyrstkomandi andi ;
galdandi andi ; ! ptc? XXX
grundleggjandi andi ;
gudsspottandi andi ;
heilsufremjandi andi ;
heimabúgvandi andi ;
heimahoyrandi andi ;
heimsfevnandi andi ;
heimsumfatandi andi ;
heystgýtandi andi ;
hugtakandi andi ;
hugvekjandi andi ;
hægstbjóðandi andi ;
høgstandandi andi ;
høgtstandandi andi ;
innistandandi andi ;
ivandi andi ;
kappingaravlagandi andi ;
krabbameinselvandi andi ;
landsdekkandi andi ;
landsfevnandi andi ;
landsumfatandi andi ;
lóggevandi andi ;
misvísandi andi ;
mótsigandi andi ;
músaelvandi andi ;
nærliggjandi andi ;
núverandi andi ;
orkukrevjandi andi ;
rættrúgvandi andi ;
samanleggjandi andi ;
semjusøkjandi andi ;
sjálvfíggjandi andi ;
sjálvregulerandi andi ;
sjúkuelvandi andi ;
skjóttgangandi andi ;
skínandi andi ;
slóðbrótandi andi ;
soljóðandi andi ;
stavilsisberandi andi ;
táverandi andi ;
tíðarkrevjandi andi ;
umgangandi andi ;
uppsøkjandi andi ;
villeiðandi andi ;
viðkonandi andi ;
viðvíkandi andi ;
vælhavandi andi ;
vælmeinandi andi ;
vælvitandi andi ;
víðfevnandi andi ;
yðjandi andi ;
ágangandi andi ;
áleikandi andi ;
álitandi andi ;
áloypandi andi ;
átreingjandi andi ;
átroðkandi andi ;
óbindandi andi ;
óhugsandi andi ;
ómissandi andi ;
ósamanhangandi andi ;
ósløkkjandi andi ;
ótolandi andi ;
óvikomandi andi ;
óviðkomandi andi ;
útbyggjandi andi ;
útfyllandi andi ;
útiarbeiðandi andi ;
verandi andi ;
framhaldandi andi ;
ferðandi andi ;
hangandi andi ;
írestandi andi ;
krevjandi andi ;
tyngjandi andi ;
afturhaldandi andi ;
tigandi andi ;
einkisigandi andi ;
várgýtandi andi ;
lemjandi andi ;
fyribyrgjandi andi ;
tiltrekkjandi andi ;
núgaldandi andi ;
heimagangandi andi ;
arbeiðsskapandi andi ;
uppvaksandi andi ;
syngjandi andi ;
sníkjandi andi ;
sjálvirkandi andi ;
peningasavnandi andi ;
niðurbrótandi andi ;
frustrerandi andi ;
fastbúgvandi andi ;
altumráðandi andi ;
óvikandi andi ;
ópassandi andi ;
yvirberandi andi ;
vælljómandi andi ;
uttanfyristandandi andi ;
spríkjandi andi ;
samanfallandi andi ;
múgvandi andi ;
kveikjandi andi ;
gjøgnumgangandi andi ;
fráhaldandi andi ;
eftirverandi andi ;
úttømandi andi ;
útfríandi andi ;
øtandi andi ;
ótemjandi andi ;
ósigandi andi ;
ómótmælandi andi ;
ólekjandi andi ;
ólastandi andi ;
óbótandi andi ;
óberandi andi ;
álitsvekjandi andi ;
yvirskotsgevandi andi ;
vónvekjandi andi ;
víðspennandi andi ;
vælskiljandi andi ;
vælfungerandi andi ;
virðisskapandi andi ;
vikarierandi andi ;
uppdragandi andi ;
undirliggjandi andi ;
tásitandi andi ;
tungtvigandi andi ;
tjúktflótandi andi ;
tilstundandi andi ;
tankavekjandi andi ;
síðuleypandi andi ;
syndtváandi andi ;
sprelllivandi andi ;
skimandi andi ;
sjálvsofrandi andi ;
sjalvandi andi ;
samkennandi andi ;
samfelagsdarvandi andi ;
rætttrúgvandi andi ;
ravruskandi andi ;
onkiskiljandi andi ;
núkomandi andi ;
niðangangandi andi ;
mótmælislíknandi andi ;
mannsømandi andi ;
lívsvarandi andi ;
lættspælandi andi ;
ljóslivandi andi ;
leggjandi andi ;
krevnandi andi ;
kapitalsavnandi andi ;
irriterandi andi ;
illgerandi andi ;
hjartarannsakandi andi ;
himinrópandi andi ;
gudsnoktandi andi ;
geislavandi andi ;
fyrrrverandi andi ;
frælsiselskandi andi ;
fjarljómandi andi ;
eymýkjandi andi ;
evnismisnýtandi andi ;
elektriserandi andi ;
eftirvirkandi andi ;
eftirlivandi andi ;
djúptgravandi andi ;
café-líknandi andi ;
altvaldandi andi ;
agiterandi andi ;
afturvenandi andi ;
altjóða indecladj ; ! Presently no tags.
sjálvforsyrgjandi andi ;
halal andi ;
følandi andi ;
ósjarmerandi andi ;
ordans andi ;
sjarmerandi andi ;
væntandi andi ;
slutt andi ;
super andi ;
ordan andi ;
avstressandi andi ;
nýmótans andi ;
